Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.040

Calling election—Receiver.

The council shall cause an election to be called upon the proposition of disincorporation. If the city or town has any indebtedness or outstanding liabilities, it shall order the election of a receiver at the same time.

[ 1997 c 361 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.07.040. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 2, part; RRS s 8915, part.]